pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla gadów i płazów: Karma dla gadów i płazów; Akcesoria do terrariów dla gadów i płazów; Ogrzewanie i oświetlanie terrariów dla gadów i płazów; Terraria dla gadów i płazów; Podłoża dla gadów i płazów
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės ropliams ir varliagyviams: Roplių ir varliagyvių maistas; Indų ropliams ir varliagyviams priedai; Indų ropliams ir varliagyviams šildymas apšvietimas; Indai ropliams ir varliagyviams; Substratas ropliams ir varliagyviams
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Hüllő- és kétéltűkellékek: Hüllő- és kétéltűételek; Hüllő- és kétéltűélőhely-kiegészítők; Hüllő- és kétéltűélőhely-fűtés és -világítás; Hüllő- és kétéltűélőhelyek; Hüllő- és kétéltűszubsztrátumok
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Reptile & Amphibian Supplies: Reptile & Amphibian Food; Reptile & Amphibian Habitat Accessories; Reptile & Amphibian Habitat Heating & Lighting; Reptile & Amphibian Habitats; Reptile & Amphibian Substrates
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Potřeby pro plazy a obojživelníky: Krmivo pro plazy a obojživelníky; Domky pro plazy a obojživelníky – příslušenství; Vytápění a osvětlení pro plazy a obojživelníky; Domky pro plazy a obojživelníky; Substráty pro plazy a obojživelníky
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 爬蟲/兩棲類用品: 爬蟲/兩棲動物飼料; 爬蟲/兩棲動物箱配件; 爬蟲/兩棲動物箱專用恆溫設備和燈泡; 爬蟲/兩棲動物箱; 爬蟲/兩棲動物箱底材
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til reptiler og padder: Foder til reptiler og padder; Tilbehør til terrarier; Varmelegemer og lamper til terrarier; Terrarier; Substrat til reptiler og padder
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Reptilien- & Amphibienbedarf: Reptilien- & Amphibienfutter; Zubehör für Terrarien; Heizung & Beleuchtung für Terrarien; Reptilien- & Amphibiengehege; Bodengrund für Reptilien & Amphibien
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Productos para reptiles y anfibios: Alimento para reptiles y anfibios; Accesorios para terrarios de reptiles y anfibios; Iluminación y calefacción de terrarios para reptiles y anfibios; Terrarios para reptiles y anfibios; Sustratos para reptiles y anfibios
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Artigos para répteis e anfíbios: Comida para répteis e anfíbios; Acessórios de habitat para répteis e anfíbios; Iluminação e aquecimento de habitat para répteis e anfíbios; Habitats para répteis e anfíbios; Substratos para répteis e anfíbios
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za plazilce in dvoživke: Hrana za plazilce in dvoživke; Oprema za terarij za plazilce in dvoživke; Ogrevanje in osvetlitev terarija za plazilce in dvoživke; Terariji za plazilce in dvoživke; Substrati za plazilce in dvoživke
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Pribor za gmazove i vodozemce: Hrana za gmazove i vodozemce; Dodaci za stanište gmazova i vodozemaca; Grijanje i rasvjeta staništa gmazova i vodozemaca; Staništa gmazova i vodozemaca; Supstrati za gmazove i vodozemce
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์เลื้อยคลานและสัตว์สะเทินน้ำสะเทินบก: อาหารสำหรับสัตว์เลื้อยคลานและสัตว์สะเทินน้ำสะเทินบก; อุปกรณ์ที่อยู่อาศัยของสัตว์เลื้อยคลานและสัตว์สะเทินน้ำสะเทินบก; อุปกรณ์ให้ความร้อนและแสงสว่างสำหรับสัตว์เลื้อยคลานและสัตว์สะเทินน้ำสะเทินบก; ที่อยู่อาศัยสำหรับสัตว์เลื้อยคลานและสัตว์สะเทินน้ำสะเทินบก; วัสดุรองพื้นสำหรับสัตว์เลื้อยคลานและสัตว์สะเทินน้ำสะเทินบก
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Sürüngen ve Amfibi Ürünleri: Sürüngen ve Amfibi Yemleri; Sürüngen ve Amfibi Ortam Aksesuarları; Sürüngen ve Amfibi Ortam Isıtıcısı ve Işıklandırması; Sürüngen ve Amfibi Ortamları; Sürüngen ve Amfibi Substratları
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για ερπετά και αμφίβια: Τροφή για ερπετά και αμφίβια; Αξεσουάρ για ερπετά και αμφίβια ενδιαιτήματα; Θέρμανση & φωτισμός ενδιαιτημάτων για ερπετά & αμφίβια; Ενδιαιτήματα για ερπετά & αμφίβια; Υποστρώματα για ερπετά & αμφίβια
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para répteis e anfíbios: Ração para répteis e anfíbios; Acessórios para moradia de répteis e anfíbios; Aquecimento e iluminação para moradia de répteis e anfíbios; Moradias para répteis e anfíbios; Substratos para répteis e anfíbios
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre plazy a obojživelníky: Krmivo pre plazy a obojživelníky; Príslušenstvo pre biotopy plazov a obojživelníkov; Vykurovanie a osvetlenie v biotopoch plazov a obojživelníkov; Biotopy plazov a obojživelníkov; Substráty pre plazy a obojživelníky
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 파충류/양서류 용품: 파충류/양서류 먹이; 파충류/양서류 집 부대용품; 파충류/양서류 집 히터/조명; 파충류/양서류 집; 파충류/양서류 바닥재
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Articoli per rettili e anfibi: Cibo per rettili e anfibi; Accessori habitat rettili e anfibi; Riscaldamento/illuminazione habitat rettili e anfibi; Habitat per rettili e anfibi; Substrati per rettili e anfibi
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru reptile/amfibieni: Hrană pentru reptile/amfibieni; Accesorii pentru habitatul reptilelor/amfibienilor; Încălzire sau iluminat pentru habitatul reptilelor/amfibienilor; Habitate pentru reptile/amfibieni; Substraturi pentru reptile/amfibieni
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till reptiler och amfibier: Mat till reptiler och amfibier; Tillbehör till terrarier för reptiler och amfibier; Värmeelement och lampor till terrarier för reptiler och amfibier; Terrarier för reptiler och amfibier; Substrat för reptiler och amfibier
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Benodigdheden voor reptielen en amfibieën: Voer voor reptielen en amfibieën; Accessoires voor reptiel- en amfibieverblijven; Verwarming en verlichting voor reptiel- en amfibieverblijven; Verblijven voor reptielen en amfibieën; Voedingsbodem voor reptielen en amfibieën
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > 爬虫類・両生類用品: 爬虫類・両生類用フード; 爬虫類・両生類飼育用品; 爬虫類・両生類飼育ケージ用ヒーター・照明装置; 爬虫類・両生類飼育ケージ; 爬虫類・両生類用底床材
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Matelijoiden ja sammakkoeläinten tarvikkeet: Matelijoiden ja sammakkoeläinten ruoka; Matelijoiden ja sammakkoeläinten asumisen tarvikkeet; Matelijoiden ja sammakkoeläinten asumisten lämmitys ja valaistus; Matelijoiden ja sammakkoeläinten asuinpaikat; Matelijoiden ja sammakkoeläinten pohjamateriaalit
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Accessoires pour reptiles et amphibiens: Nourriture pour reptiles et amphibiens; Accessoires pour terrariums reptiles et amphibiens; Chauffage et éclairage pour terrariums reptiles et amphibiens; Terrariums pour reptiles et amphibiens; Substrats pour reptiles et amphibiens
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Товары для рептилий и амфибий: Корм для рептилий и амфибий; Аксессуары для различных видов террариумов; Обогрев и освещение различных видов террариумов; Емкости для содержания рептилий и амфибий; Грунты для рептилий и амфибий
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Sản phẩm nuôi và chăm sóc bò sát & lưỡng cư: Thức ăn cho động vật lưỡng cư và loài bò sát; Phụ kiện cho nơi ở của động vật lưỡng cư và loài bò sát; Thiết bị sưởi và chiếu sáng cho nơi ở của động vật lưỡng cư và loài bò sát; Chỗ ở của động vật lưỡng cư và loài bò sát; Lớp lót chỗ nằm của động vật lưỡng cư và loài bò sát
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 爬行/两栖动物用品: 爬行/两栖动物食物; 爬行/两栖动物住所配件; 爬行/两栖动物住所取暖照明设备; 爬行/两栖动物住所; 爬行/两栖动物铺垫物
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Консумативи за влечуги и земноводни: Храна за влечуги и земноводни; Аксесоари за местообитания на влечуги и земноводни; Отопление и осветление за местообитание на влечуги и земноводни; Местообитания на влечуги и земноводни; Субстрати за влечуги и земноводни
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Produkter for reptiler og amfibier: Mat for reptiler og amfibier; Habitattilbehør for reptiler og amfibier; Habitatoppvarming og -belysning for reptiler og amfibier; Habitater for reptiler og amfibier; Underlag for reptiler og amfibier